Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.430

Assisted living facility temporary management account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The assisted living facility temporary management account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties imposed under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the protection of the health, safety, welfare, or property of residents of assisted living facilities found to be deficient. Uses of the account include, but are not limited to:

(1) Payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other facilities;

(2) Payment to maintain operation of an assisted living facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, including payment of costs associated with temporary management authorized under this chapter;

(3) Reimbursement of residents for personal funds or property lost or stolen when the resident's personal funds or property cannot be recovered from the assisted living facility or third-party insurer; and

(4) The protection of the health, safety, welfare, and property of residents of assisted living facilities found to be noncompliant with licensing standards.

[ 2018 c 173 s 5; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 912; 2012 c 10 s 32; 2007 c 162 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2018 c 173: See note following RCW 18.20.500.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 18, 2016]." [ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 952.]

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.